Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 39

Rights Of Surviving Family Members

Subchapter 1

— Allowances to Family

28-39-101. Allowances to surviving spouse and minor children.

(1)In addition to their homestead, dower, and curtesy rights, the surviving spouse and minor children of a decedent, or either in the absence of the other, shall be entitled to have assigned to them out of the property owned by the decedent at the time of his or her death, personal property, tangible or intangible, to be selected prior to the sale thereof by the personal representative or after sale out of the proceeds thereof by the surviving spouse, if there is a surviving spouse or, otherwise, by the guardian of the minor children, when the personal property is of the value of four thousand dollars ($4,000) as against distributees or the value of two thousand dollars ($2,000) as against creditors.

The right to such an allowance shall vest in the surviving spouse upon the death of his or her spouse, shall not terminate with his or her subsequent death or remarriage, and shall become his or her absolute property or the property of his or her estate upon death without restriction as to use, encumbrance, or disposition.

If any of the minor children are not children of the surviving spouse, the allowance shall vest in the surviving spouse to the extent of one-half (½) thereof, and the remainder shall vest in the decedent's minor children in equal shares.

Such furniture, furnishings, appliances, implements, and equipment as shall be reasonably necessary for the family use and occupancy of his or her dwelling shall be assigned to and vested in the surviving spouse, if any, provided he or she was living with the decedent at the time of his or her death.

During a period of two (2) months after the death of the decedent, the surviving spouse and minor children, or either in the absence of the other, shall be entitled to receive from the estate such reasonable amount, not exceeding in the aggregate one thousand dollars ($1,000), as in the judgment of the court may be required for their sustenance, in accordance with the usual living standards of the family.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 108; 1951, No. 255, § 10; 1967, No. 287, § 8; 1981, No. 714, § 68; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2501; Acts 2003, No. 177, §§ 1, 2.

Partnership Property.

28-39-102. Right of surviving spouse to live in house for two months — Sustenance.

A surviving spouse may reside in the chief residence of the deceased spouse for two (2) months after death, whether or not dower or curtesy is assigned sooner, without being liable for any rent. In the meantime, the surviving spouse shall have a reasonable sustenance out of the estate of the deceased spouse.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 17; C. & M. Dig., § 3530; Pope's Dig., § 4415; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 69; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2501.1.

28-39-103. Extension of surviving spouse's quarantine.

If the dower or curtesy of any surviving spouse is not assigned and laid off within two (2) months after the death of a deceased spouse, the surviving spouse shall remain in and possess the chief residence of the deceased spouse, together with the land thereto attached, free of all rent, until dower or curtesy shall be laid off and assigned to the surviving spouse.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 18; C. & M. Dig., § 3531; Pope's Dig., § 4416; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 70; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2501.2.

28-39-104. Allowance paid surviving spouse out of rent until apportionment of curtesy or dower.

Until curtesy or dower is apportioned, the court shall order such sums to be paid to the surviving spouse out of the rent of the real estate as shall be in proportion to his or her interest in the real estate.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 4, § 139; C. & M. Dig., § 89; Pope's Dig., § 89; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 71; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2501.3.

28-39-105. Advancements to minor distributees.

If the court finds that the estate is evidently solvent and that the share of a distributee who is a minor is sufficient to provide therefor, the court may order the personal representative to pay an allowance, reasonable according to the usual standard of living of the family, to the guardian of the person or estate of the minor distributee for his or her maintenance, care, or education, and to charge the allowance against the share of the distributee.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 109; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2502.

Subchapter 2

— Homestead Rights

Cross References. Homestead rights of widow and children, Ark. Const., Art. 9, § 6.

Rural homesteads, limitations, Ark. Const., Art. 9, § 4.

Urban homesteads, limitations, Ark. Const., Art. 9, § 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 1873, No. 105, § 11: effective on passage.

Acts 1981, No. 663, § 9: Mar. 23, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that existing law relating to homestead does not in all circumstances provide for equal treatment between the sexes, that the constitutionality of such existing law has been drawn into question by decisions of the United States Supreme Court and the Arkansas Supreme Court, and that there is an urgent need to insure that the law provides equality in the rights and interests of a surviving spouse in the homestead of his or her deceased spouse, without reference to the sex of the surviving spouse. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 714, § 75: Mar. 25, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that existing law relating to such matters as homestead, dower, curtesy, statutory allowances payable from a decedent's estate, and the right of a surviving spouse to take against the will of a decedent, do not in all circumstances provide for equal treatment between the sexes, that the constitutionality of such existing law has been drawn into question by decisions of the United States Supreme Court and the Arkansas Supreme Court, and that there is an urgent need to insure that the law provides equality in the property rights and interests of married persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

28-39-201. Rights of surviving spouse and children.

If the owner of a homestead dies leaving a surviving spouse, but no children, and the surviving spouse has no separate homestead in his or her own right, the homestead shall be exempt, and the rents and profits thereof shall vest in the surviving spouse during his or her natural life.

However, if the owner leaves one (1) or more children, the child or children shall share with the surviving spouse and be entitled to one-half (½) the rents and profits till each of them arrives at twenty-one (21) years of age, each child's right to cease at twenty-one (21) years of age, and the shares to go to the younger children and then all to go to the surviving spouse. The surviving spouse or children may reside on the homestead or not.

In case of the death of the surviving spouse, all of the homestead shall be vested in the minor children of the original homestead owner.

Any rights and benefits given by this section shall not vest until the parties have been continuously married to each other for a period in excess of one (1) year.

Publisher's Notes. In Stokes v. Stokes, 271 Ark. 300, 613 S.W.2d 372 (1981), the Arkansas Supreme Court held that various statutes containing dower provisions were unconstitutional under the Fourteenth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution because they were gender-based and did not serve an important governmental function. The statutes involved (§§28-11-101,28-11-201,28-11-301,28-11-303,28-11-306,28-39-101,28-39-401) have since been amended to delete the gender-based classifications. The court recognized in the Stokes case that Ark. Const., Art. 9, § 6, which determines the homestead rights of a surviving widow and children, is also gender-based but refrained from passing on the validity of the section since homestead rights were not involved in the case. In response to this decision, the Arkansas General Assembly enacted the Homestead Exemption Act of 1981 (§§16-66-210,28-39-201), which provides a homestead exemption that is not gender-based.

Ark. L. Notes.

Laurence, Does Arkansas's Homestead Exemption Survive a Divorce? Should It?, 1988 Ark. L. Notes 15.

Ark. L. Rev.

Comment, Arkansas Marriage: A Partnership Between a Husband and Wife, or a Safety Net for Support?, 61 Ark. L. Rev. 735.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Legislative Survey, Property, 4 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 607.

This section follows the language of Ark. Const., Art. 9, § 6; as in the Constitution, this section does not mention or provide for grandchildren. McCoy v. Walker, 317 Ark. 86, 876 S.W.2d 252 (1994).

The minor grandchildren of a decedent who would inherit from the decedent under the laws of descent and distribution do not have homestead rights under this section, because they do not fall within the definition of “child” in §28-1-102(a)(1). McCoy v. Walker, 317 Ark. 86, 876 S.W.2d 252 (1994).

Trial court did not err in finding a wife was entitled to a homestead share of a testator's estate under subsection (a) of this section despite the fact that they had been separated for 17 years, a the evidence showed the wife did not intend to abandon the marital home but intended to return when the wife felt the testator was no longer abusive.Sexton v. Sexton (In re Sexton), 2011 Ark. App. 163, 382 S.W.3d 679 (2011).

Husband's interest in wife's ancestral lands is fixed by former § 61-228 (repealed), and the law gives the husband no additional right of homestead in his deceased wife's land. Trice v. Miller, 217 Ark. 229, 229 S.W.2d 233 (1950).

A widow is entitled to have dower and homestead allotted and admeasured in time in the land if it can be done without great prejudice to the parties; therefore, a widow was entitled to have the order of a probate court assigning her dower and homestead affirmed, and laches could not be urged by the son against his mother, the widow, inasmuch as he had entered into an agreement with his mother and brother as to farming the land, he also having agreed to the report of the commissioners allotting the dower and homestead lands. Marsh v. Marsh, 230 Ark. 59, 320 S.W.2d 754 (1959).

Town or city lot was understood to be the piece of ground on which the head of a family had a house, with appurtenances, maintained as a home, without regard to whether it contained more or less than one lot according to the plat or survey of the city or town. Wassell v. Tunnah, 25 Ark. 101 (1867) (decision under prior law).

The domicile of the wife and minor children follows that of the husband, and their actual personal residence at the homestead place is not necessary to perfect the right in him, or to entitle them to the benefit of it after his death. Where the head of a family has, in good faith, selected a place of residence, owns the land, and has entered and resides upon it, the absence of the wife and children might require stronger proof of intention, but nothing more. Johnston v. Turner, 29 Ark. 280 (1874).

A clerk's reservation under this section does not vest the homestead in a widow, and such vesting does not occur until the commissioners appointed under §28-39-203 have reported; even then vesting is subject to contest as provided in §§28-39-203 —28-39-206. Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975).

Cited: Price v. Price, 253 Ark. 1124, 491 S.W.2d 793 (1973); Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975).

Cited: Price v. Price, 253 Ark. 1124, 491 S.W.2d 793 (1973).

A court did not err in not ordering a sale under this section where the value as fixed by the commissioners was erroneous. Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975).

Cited: Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning appeal, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 952, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1873, No. 105, § 7, p. 244; C. & M. Dig., § 5536; Pope's Dig., § 7175; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 47; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-608.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 663, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 30-225.

28-39-202. Petition to reserve homestead.

Whenever any resident of this state shall die, leaving a surviving spouse or children who may desire to claim the benefit of Arkansas Constitution, Article 9, §§ 6 and 10 or §28-39-201, he or she shall file with the probate clerk of the circuit court of the county in which the homestead is situated an accurate description of the land so claimed, or, if the land is a lot in any city, town, or village, a description of the lot shall be filed, and the surviving spouse and children shall apply to have the land or lot reserved from sale.

Immediately after the filing of the description and application, it shall be the duty of the clerk to enter upon the records of the court that the homestead has been duly reserved from sale upon the application of the claimant.

History.

Acts 1873, No. 105, §§ 1, 2, p. 244; C. & M. Dig., §§ 5525, 5526; Pope's Dig., §§ 7164, 7165; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 43; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-601, 62-602; Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 274.

28-39-203. Appraisal of homestead — Effect.

Upon written application to the clerk by any party interested in the estate of a deceased person, setting forth that the homestead so claimed by the surviving spouse or children, if a lot in any city, town, or village, exceeds the value of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), it shall be the duty of the clerk to appoint forthwith three (3) trustworthy and disinterested citizens of the county as commissioners.

After having been duly summoned and sworn by the clerk for that purpose, the commissioners shall proceed without delay to make a fair appraisal of the value of the lot, with the dwellings and appurtenances thereon. Within ten (10) days thereafter, they shall return the appraisal to the office of the clerk, to be by him or her immediately filed.

If a majority of the commissioners decides that the lot so claimed as a homestead is within the valuation prescribed by the Arkansas Constitution, then it shall be the duty of the clerk to make an entry upon the records of the court, reciting the proceedings had and the return of the commissioners, and vesting the homestead in the party or parties claimant, and, also, to tax the costs of the proceedings against the party at whose instance the appraisal was made.

However, if the decision is that the lot exceeds in value the amount exempted by the Arkansas Constitution, it shall be the duty of the clerk to note the excess upon the record and tax the costs of the proceedings to the claimants.

History.

Acts 1873, No. 105, §§ 3, 4, p. 244; C. & M. Dig., §§ 5527 — 5529; Pope's Dig., §§ 7166 — 7168; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 44; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-603, 62-604.

28-39-204. Sale of homestead exceeding value limitations.

Whenever it shall be made to appear to the satisfaction of the court having probate jurisdiction, by the appraisal of the commissioners provided for in this chapter, that the lot exceeds in value the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), it shall be the duty of the court to order the lot to be sold by the sheriff of the county, at public auction to the highest bidders, for cash in hand, within sixty (60) days after the making of the order, and, upon thirty (30) days' advertisement of the sale and actual written notice served upon the surviving spouse and children, as to the time, place, and terms of the sale.

(1)It shall be the duty of the sheriff, should the lot bring more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), to pay over immediately the excess to the administrator or executor of the estate of the deceased and to hold the two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), subject to the order of the court or the judge, either in term time or in vacation, as the case may be.

It shall be the duty of the court to require a full and particular account of the action of the sheriff in the premises, which shall be filed with the clerk of the court within ten (10) days after the sale.

At any time after the filing of the statement, the court or judge shall make an order allowing the surviving spouse or children, as the case may be, to select a homestead in any part of the state, which is to be paid for under the direction and supervision of the court, or judge in vacation.

If the lot does not bring more than the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), it shall not be again offered for sale, but shall thereafter constitute the homestead of the surviving spouse or children.

History.

Acts 1873, No. 105, § 5, p. 244; C. & M. Dig., §§ 5530-5534; Pope's Dig., §§ 7169-7173; Acts 1981, No. 714, §§ 45, 46; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-605, 62-606.

28-39-205. Contest of commissioners' report.

Either party may put in issue the truth of the report of the commissioners, by a petition filed in the court having probate jurisdiction.

A summons shall be issued as in other cases, giving at least fifteen (15) days' notice to the adverse party, requiring him or her to appear and answer.

The costs of these proceedings shall be paid as in other cases.

History.

Acts 1873, No. 105, § 6, p. 244; C. & M. Dig., § 5535; Pope's Dig., § 7174; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-607.

28-39-206. [Repealed.]

28-39-207. Disturbance of possession — Penalty.

When the provisions of the foregoing sections have been complied with by the parties claimant, any administrators or executors of the estate of the deceased who shall assume the possession of or in any manner disturb the surviving spouse or children of the deceased in the enjoyment of the homestead, or undertake to sell the homestead, shall be adjudged guilty of a misdemeanor. Upon conviction, the administrator or executor shall be imprisoned in the county jail for a term not less than one (1) month nor more than two (2) months and shall be fined in any sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) and shall also be liable upon his or her official bond to the injured parties in twice the amount of damages which they may have sustained.

History.

Acts 1873, No. 105, § 9, p. 244; C. & M. Dig., § 5538; Pope's Dig., § 7177; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 48; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-609.

Subchapter 3

— Assignment of Dower and Curtesy

Cross References. Provisions in lieu of dower, effect, election, §28-11-401 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1857, § 5, p. 167: effective on passage.

Acts 1981, No. 714, § 75: Mar. 25, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that existing law relating to such matters as homestead, dower, curtesy, statutory allowances payable from a decedent's estate, and the right of a surviving spouse to take against the will of a decedent, do not in all circumstances provide for equal treatment between the sexes, that the constitutionality of such existing law has been drawn into question by decisions of the United States Supreme Court and the Arkansas Supreme Court, and that there is an urgent need to insure that the law provides equality in the property rights and interests of married persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

28-39-301. Assignment by heir — Acceptance.

It shall be the duty of the heir at law of any estate of which the surviving spouse is entitled to dower or curtesy to lay off and assign the dower or curtesy as soon as practicable after the death of the deceased spouse. If the heirs to any estate are minors, they shall act, in the assignment of dower or curtesy, by their guardians.

If the dower or curtesy assigned by the heir at law is accepted by the surviving spouse, the heir at law shall make a statement of the assignment, specifying what lands have been assigned, and the acceptance of the surviving spouse shall be endorsed thereon.

The statements and specification of dower or curtesy, and acceptance thereof, shall be proved or acknowledged by both parties and filed with and recorded by the probate clerk of the circuit court, which will then be a sufficient assignment of dower or curtesy and shall bar any further demand for dower or curtesy in the property specified in the statement.

Dower in lands is assigned by the heirs and in the personal property by the administrator. Hill's Adm'rs v. Mitchell, 5 Ark. (5 Pike) 608 (1844).

Dower under Arkansas law includes, by definition, the possibility of commutation to a sum certain. Mauldin v. United States, 468 F. Supp. 422 (E.D. Ark. 1979).

A widow cannot dispose of her dower interest until it has been assigned. Jacks v. Dyer, 31 Ark. 334 (1876).

If a widow conveys her unassigned dower interest, the heir may recover possession of the land from the widow's vendee, for the conveyance gives him a right only to have her dower set aside and assigned to him, her right of occupancy being personal and not transferable. Stull v. Graham, 60 Ark. 461, 31 S.W. 46 (1895); Brinkley v. Taylor, 111 Ark. 305, 163 S.W. 521 (1914).

A conveyance by a widow of unassigned dower has been upheld in equity. Weaver v. Rush, 62 Ark. 51, 34 S.W. 256 (1896); Barnett v. Meacham, 62 Ark. 313, 35 S.W. 533 (1896).

Where a widow and her daughters agreed, by reference to actuarial tables, that the present cash value of the widow's commuted life interest in real estate left by the decedent was $17,991.36, this amount was paid to the widow in cash out of the estate, and it was not necessary to sell any of the realty; and where on payment to the widow of her commuted dower and homestead, the heirs at law became unconditionally entitled to the fee in their father's lands, this $17,991.36 qualified for the marital deduction under section 2056 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 2056). Mauldin v. United States, 468 F. Supp. 422 (E.D. Ark. 1979).

Occupancy of homestead was not adverse to heirs where they failed to assign dower. Boyd v. Epperson, 149 Ark. 527, 232 S.W. 939 (1921).

Until it is assigned to her, a widow's dower is merely a right to compel the setting aside to her of her dower interest, and not an estate in itself, but, when assigned, it becomes a life estate in the lands assigned. Bradham v. United States, 287 F. Supp. 10 (W.D. Ark. 1968).

The inheritance is cast upon the heir, and it is his duty to assign the widow's dower; however, until the debts are paid the administrator is entitled to possession. Menifee's Adm'rs v. Menifee, 8 Ark. (3 English) 9 (1847), and Morrill v. Menifee, 5 Ark. (5 Pike) 629 (1844).

A widow may, before assignment, release to the persons holding legal title. Reed v. Ash, 30 Ark. 775 (1875).

Though the heir is a minor, a widow is still entitled to remain in possession until dower is assigned. Trimble v. James, 40 Ark. 393 (1883); Wallace v. King, 205 Ark. 681, 170 S.W.2d 377 (1943).

Since this section places the duty of allotting dower or curtesy upon the heir at law, the fact that the surviving husband was tardy in filing his petition for allotment of curtesy will not be considered a waiver against the remaining funds, particularly when such a waiver would work in favor of the heir at law who had the duty to allot curtesy. Quick v. Davidson, 261 Ark. 38, 545 S.W.2d 917 (1977).

Cited: Stokes v. Stokes, 271 Ark. 300, 613 S.W.2d 372 (1981).

Should there be production of oil or gas under any lease executed by the surviving spouse, he or she shall be entitled to receive the royalty payments so long as the surviving spouse lives.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Wright, The Arkansas Law of Oil and Gas, 9 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 223.

If the petition is filed against infants or persons of unsound mind, the guardian or committee may appear and defend for them and protect their interests, and, if the guardian or committee does not appear and defend, the court shall appoint some discreet person for that purpose.

If any person summoned, as provided in this section, desires to contest the rights of the petitioner or the statements in the petition, he or she shall do so by a written answer, and the questions of the law and fact thereupon arising shall be tried and determined by the circuit court.

The costs of the division and allotment shall be apportioned among the parties in the ratio of their interests, and the costs arising from any contest of fact or law shall be paid by the party adjudged to be in the wrong.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “by Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure” for “in §16-58-130” in (c).

The executors of a deceased husband may not bring an action to have dower set aside to the widow. Jameson v. Davis, 124 Ark. 399, 187 S.W. 314 (1916).

Where widow joined with deceased's son in petitioning that certain lands be awarded to him, she was thereafter estopped to assert a claim for dower against the purchaser from the son. Owen v. Cox, 122 Ark. 78, 182 S.W. 559 (1916).

There is no authority that would allow the probate court to receive evidence of the property's value and then place a value on the property accordingly. In re Estate of Jones, 317 Ark. 606, 879 S.W.2d 433 (1994).

This statutory remedy does not oust the jurisdiction of equity. Johnson v. Johnson, 84 Ark. 307, 105 S.W. 869 (1907) (decision under prior law).

Where dower was not allotted to a widow by the probate court, although a petition was filed in the court and no final judgment rendered thereby, an action was not barred in chancery court for an allotment of dower. Kendall v. Crenshaw, 116 Ark. 427, 173 S.W. 393 (1915) (decision under prior law).

Where a probate court assumes jurisdiction to allot dower in personalty, a chancery court should not interfere. Shields v. Shields, 183 Ark. 44, 34 S.W.2d 1068 (1931) (decision under prior law).

The power of a probate court to assign dower under this subchapter does not deprive a chancery court of its inherent jurisdiction; rather, the jurisdiction of these courts to assign dower is concurrent. Doss v. Taylor, 244 Ark. 252, 424 S.W.2d 541 (1968) (decision under prior law).

A widow is entitled to have dower and homestead allotted and admeasured in time in the land if it can be done without great prejudice to the parties; therefore, a widow was entitled to have an order of a probate court assigning her dower and homestead affirmed, and laches could not be urged by the son against his mother, the widow, inasmuch as he had entered into an agreement with his mother and brother as to farming the land, he also having agreed to the report of the commissioners allotting the dower and homestead lands. Marsh v. Marsh, 230 Ark. 59, 320 S.W.2d 754 (1959).

The statute of limitations runs in favor of a stranger from the date of the husband's death. Stidham v. Matthews, 29 Ark. 650 (1874).

A claim for dower is not barred by limitation so long as the heirs continue in possession. Livingston v. Cochran, 33 Ark. 294 (1878); McWhirter v. Roberts, 40 Ark. 283 (1883).

Where record is silent it will be presumed that notice was given. Briggs v. Manning, 80 Ark. 303, 80 Ark. 304, 97 S.W. 289 (1906).

Notice may be given before the application is filed. Briggs v. Manning, 80 Ark. 303, 80 Ark. 304, 97 S.W. 289 (1906).

Failure to summon all interested persons invalidates an allotment. Cunningham v. Dellmon, 151 Ark. 409, 237 S.W. 450 (1922).

Section 28-49-104, relating to compromise of claims, was inapplicable to petition of widow, as administrator, alleging that estate was insufficient to satisfy dower and statutory rights of widow or to pay claims and expenses of administration in full and seeking full distribution of assets in exchange of her payment of claims and expenses, and order granting petition would be set aside where notice provided by this section was not given. Wilson v. Davis, 239 Ark. 305, 389 S.W.2d 442 (1965).

The heirs and devisees are necessary parties to a suit to have dower set aside to the wife. Jameson v. Davis, 124 Ark. 399, 187 S.W. 314 (1916).

No dower can be assigned in lands not embraced in a petition. Falls v. Wright, 55 Ark. 562, 18 S.W. 1044 (1892).

A petition alleging that the plaintiff is the widow of the deceased, who was a citizen of the county, and who died possessed of certain property set out in a schedule attached to the petition, states facts sufficient to give a probate court jurisdiction to assign dower in the property. Carter v. Younger, 112 Ark. 483, 166 S.W. 547 (1914).

Where demand was made by surviving husband for the allotment of curtesy and the demand was addressed to the beneficiary under the will as executor, the court would refuse to quash service since beneficiary was actually served personally, even though it was in his capacity as executor. Anderson v. Parker, 229 Ark. 683, 317 S.W.2d 721 (1958).

Cited: Bradham v. United States, 287 F. Supp. 10 (W.D. Ark. 1968).

The fact that appellants did not appeal from order approving commissioner's report prior to probate court's final order, even though they might have done so, did not constitute a bar to a later appeal. Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975).

Dower and homestead are distinct rights, and widow is entitled to one-third of husband's realty, including homestead, and may have it laid off elsewhere than upon the homestead. Horton v. Hilliard, 58 Ark. 298, 24 S.W. 242 (1893); Jameson v. Jameson, 117 Ark. 142, 173 S.W. 851 (1915); Arbaugh v. West, 127 Ark. 98, 192 S.W. 171 (1917).

The commissioners must take notice of the homestead. Horton v. Hilliard, 58 Ark. 298, 24 S.W. 242 (1893).

Cited: Phillips v. First Nat'l Bank, 179 Ark. 605, 17 S.W.2d 298 (1929); Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, §§ 29-31; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3544-3546; Pope's Dig., §§ 4430-4432; Acts 1981, No. 714, §§ 49-51; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-701 — 62-703.

28-39-302. Assignment by heir — Grant of severance rights required.

The heirs in any estate cannot assign or secure an assignment of dower or curtesy in lands in this state unless and until the heirs of the estate comply with the provisions set out in subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

Before assignment of dower or curtesy can be made by the heirs as against a surviving spouse, the heirs shall first execute an agreement, or the agreement of a guardian shall be approved by the court, by which agreement the surviving spouse is given permission to sell timber on lands set aside to the surviving spouse under selective cutting practices as used or adopted by general practice in the area where the land is situated.

In addition to rights granted in subsection (b) of this section, the heirs shall grant, by proper agreement, to the surviving spouse, the right to execute good, valid, and binding oil and gas leases covering lands set aside to the surviving spouse by which the surviving spouse shall receive the bonus money for any lease and receive the delay rentals so long as they are payable, or so long as the surviving spouse lives.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 189, §§ 1-4; 1981, No. 714, §§ 63-66; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-722 — 62-725.

28-39-303. Proceedings for allotment.

If dower or curtesy is not assigned to the surviving spouse within one (1) year after the death of his or her spouse, or within three (3) months after demand made therefor, the surviving spouse may file a written petition in the circuit court. This petition shall include a description of the lands in which he or she claims dower or curtesy, the names of those having interest in the lands, and the amount of the interest briefly stated in ordinary language with a prayer for the allotment of dower or curtesy. All persons interested in the property shall be summoned to appear and answer the petition.

Upon the petition's by all interested in the property being filed, or upon a summons being served upon all who have an interest in the property, the circuit court may make an order for the allotment of dower or curtesy according to the rights of the parties by commissioners appointed according to law.

Parties interested may be constructively summoned, as provided by Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.

(1)No verification shall be required to the petition or answer.

Petitions for dower or curtesy shall be heard and determined by the court without the necessity of formal pleading upon the petition, answer, exhibits, and other testimony.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, §§ 32, 37, 39; Civil Code, §§ 538-541, 543, 547, 548; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3547-3552, 3560; Pope's Dig., §§ 4433-4438, 4446; Acts 1981, No. 714, §§ 52-54; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-704 — 62-710, 62-721; Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 275; 2013, No. 1148, § 59.

Parties.

28-39-304. Assignment by commissioners.

In all cases when it orders and decrees dower or curtesy to any surviving spouse, the court shall appoint three (3) commissioners of the vicinity who shall proceed to the premises in question and, by survey and measurement, lay off and designate by proper metes and bounds the dower or curtesy of the surviving spouse, in accordance with the decree of the court.

In all assignments of dower or curtesy to any surviving spouse, it shall be the duty of the commissioners, who may be appointed to lay off the dower or curtesy, if the estate will permit such a division without essential injury, to lay off the dower or curtesy in the lands of the deceased spouse so that the usual dwelling of the deceased spouse and family shall be included in the assignment of dower or curtesy to the surviving spouse.

The commissioners appointed to lay off dower or curtesy in the lands of the deceased spouse, under existing laws, shall lay off the dower or curtesy on any part of the lands of the deceased at the request of the surviving spouse who is to be endowed, whether the lands shall include the usual dwelling of the deceased spouse and family or not, if it can be done without essential injury to the estate.

The commissioners shall make a detailed report of their proceedings to the next term of the court.

Upon the report's being returned, the court may confirm or set the report aside or remand it to the commissioners for correction. If approved by the court, the report shall be entered of record and be conclusive on the parties.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, §§ 19, 40, 41; Acts 1857, § 1, p. 167; Civil Code, § 545; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3532, 3533, 3553-3555; Pope's Dig., §§ 4417, 4418, 4439-4441; Acts 1981, No. 714, §§ 55-57, A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-711 — 62-715.

28-39-305. Rental of indivisible property.

In cases in which lands or tenements will not permit division, the court, being satisfied of that fact or on the report of the commissioners to that effect, shall order that the tenements or lands be rented out and that one-third (1/3) part of the proceeds be paid to the surviving spouse in lieu of dower or curtesy in the lands or tenements.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 42; C. & M. Dig., § 3556; Pope's Dig., § 4442; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 58; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-716.

28-39-306. Sale of property indivisible without prejudice.

In proceedings in the circuit court for the allotment of dower or curtesy, when it appears to the court that dower or curtesy cannot be allotted out of the real estate without great prejudice to the surviving spouse or heirs and that it will be most to the interest of the parties that the real estate may be sold, the court may decree a sale of the real estate free from the dower or curtesy and decree that a portion of the proceeds may be paid to the surviving spouse in lieu of the dower or curtesy or interest otherwise secured to the surviving spouse as to the court may seem equitable and just.

History.

Acts 1873, No. 53, § 10, p. 113; C. & M. Dig., § 3534; Pope's Dig., § 4419; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 59; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-717.

28-39-307. Rights of surviving spouse when dower or curtesy land alienated by heir.

If the heir alienates lands of which a surviving spouse is entitled to dower or curtesy, he or she shall still be decreed his curtesy or her dower in the lands so alienated, in whosesoever hands the land may be.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 49; C. & M. Dig., § 3558; Pope's Dig., § 4444; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 61; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-719.

28-39-308. Surviving spouse's bequest of growing crop.

A surviving spouse may bequeath the crop in the ground of the land held by him or her in curtesy or dower at the time of his or her death. If he or she dies intestate, the crop shall go to his or her administrator.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 50; C. & M. Dig., § 3559; Pope's Dig., § 4445; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 62; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-720.

28-39-309. Recovery of dower or curtesy lands taken from surviving spouse — Damages.

If the land assigned and laid off to any surviving spouse is deforced from his or her possession, the surviving spouse shall have an action for the recovery of possession of the land, with double damages for the deforcement, or a surviving spouse may sue for the damages alone and recover double the actual damage sustained from time to time, until the surviving spouse is put in possession of the dower or curtesy held by the deforcer or detainer.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 48; C. & M. Dig., § 3557; Pope's Dig., § 4443; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 60; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-718.

Subchapter 4

— Taking Against the Will

Effective Dates. Acts 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 14, § 4: Mar. 13, 1970. Emergency clause provided: “It appearing that the Legislature, in enacting The Arkansas Inheritance Code of 1969 (Act No. 303, approved March 21, 1969), failed to enact certain essential amendments to Sections 33 and 36 of Act 140 approved February 23, 1949, with the result that where a deceased testator or testatrix leaves no surviving descendant, his or her surviving spouse conceivably has the power to nullify the will of the deceased spouse to an extent to which in some situations might be unconscionable. It was not the intention of the 1969 General Assembly in the enactment of said Act No. 303 to grant a windfall to any person and to create an inequitable result. Therefore, the passage of this Act is for the purpose of clarification and to prevent misconstruction of Act No. 303. Since all property owners and titles to property, real and personal, are affected by said Act No. 303, it is hereby declared that the passage of this Act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety; and an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 714, § 75: Mar. 25, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that existing law relating to such matters as homestead, dower, curtesy, statutory allowances payable from a decedent's estate, and the right of a surviving spouse to take against the will of a decedent, do not in all circumstances provide for equal treatment between the sexes, that the constitutionality of such existing law has been drawn into question by decisions of the United States Supreme Court and the Arkansas Supreme Court, and that there is an urgent need to insure that the law provides equality in the property rights and interests of married persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”